Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 7 Adoption of Children

15-7-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1982, ch. 318, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 254, § 4, effective June 19, 1986; P.L. 1986, ch. 274, § 4, effective July 1, 1986. For present provisions of law, see §§

42-72.1-4

and

42-72.1-7

.

15-7-2.
Report, investigation, and hearing on placement of child for adoption.

Whenever a parent or parents places a child with a person or persons, other than a father, brother, sister, aunt, uncle, grandparent, or stepparent of the child for adoption purposes, the person or persons with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall, within fifteen (15) days of the placement, notify the department of children, youth, and families of the placement.

The willful failure, neglect, or refusal of the person or persons with whom the child has been placed to make the report within fifteen (15) days shall be considered in violation of this chapter and prejudicial to the best interests of the child. The department shall, when it receives the notice or when it receives notice from any source that the person or persons with whom the child has been placed has failed, refused, or neglected to make the report within fifteen (15) days of placement, make any investigation that it deems necessary in the circumstances.

The results of the investigation shall be then referred to the family court within sixty (60) days of the receipt by the department of the notice.

The family court, after any notice that it deems proper to the parent or parents and the person or persons with whom the child has been placed, shall hold a hearing to determine whether the placement of the child is or is not for the best interest of the child.

If the court finds that the placement is not for the best interest of the child, or is contrary to law, it shall order that the child be returned to its parent or parents or placed with the department or a licensed child placing agency or with whomsoever the court deems for the best interest of the child.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-2

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1962, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

15-7-2.1.
Pre-adoption report on child placed for adoption.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, in those cases where a child is placed for adoption by the department of children, youth and families or a licensed child placement agency, the agency shall provide a pre-adoption report in writing to the prospective adoptive parents as early as practicable after the filing of a termination of parental rights or direct consent adoption petition and before a prospective adoptive parent agrees to accept the child for purposes of adoption. The pre-adoptive report shall include the following information that is reasonably available within the records of the department of children, youth and families or the licensed child placement agency that is placing a child for adoption:

A current medical, dental, developmental and psychological history of the child, including an account of the child’s prenatal care, medical condition at birth, developmental milestones; any medical, psychological or psychiatric examination and diagnosis related to the child; any physical, sexual or emotional abuse or neglect suffered by the child; any developmental assessment and a record of any immunizations and health care received while the child was in foster or other care; the child’s enrollment and performance in school and any special educational needs and any adjudications of waywardness and/or delinquency.

If the child has undergone any genetic testing, and the agency is aware of the results, those results must be disclosed in the report to the prospective adoptive parents.

If the child has been tested for HIV, and the agency is aware of the results, those results must be disclosed in the report to the prospective adoptive parents.

The age, race, religion, ethnicity and general physical appearance of biological parents.

The educational levels of biological parents, including any known diagnosed learning disabilities.

The relationship between biological parents; the age and sex of any other children born to the biological parents and if a parent is deceased, the cause of and the age at death.

Nonidentifying medical, substance abuse and mental health histories of the biological parents and siblings; the medical and mental health histories shall include drugs and medications taken by the child’s biological mother during pregnancy, any known allergies, hereditary, genetic or metabolic diseases.

The circumstances of any judicial order terminating the parental rights of a parent for abuse, neglect, abandonment, or other mistreatment of the child.

The length of time the child has been in the care of the agency and the child’s placement history.

Any information necessary to determine the child’s eligibility for state or federal benefits.

No information provided under subsection (a) shall disclose the name, or last known address of the biological relatives.

A report furnished under this section must be signed and dated by the individual who prepared the report.

Any report regarding the child, furnished pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section may disclose the identity of providers of professional services to the child.

The agency shall not be liable for the accuracy and completeness and shall be held harmless for information provided by the biological parents and others that it reasonably relies on to prepare the preadoption report.

Any of the information listed in subsection (a), in the possession of the department of children, youth and families that is related to adoption proceedings completed prior to the effective date of this act [July 8, 2005] shall be supplied to the adoptive parents or an adoptee under this section, who is 18 years of age or over, upon request.

If information listed in subsection (a) that was not available at the time the preadoption report was forwarded to the prospective adoptive parents becomes available prior to the adoption proceeding, the director shall prepare a supplemental written report detailing said information. If subsequent to the adoption, the biological parent or sibling contacts the agency for the purpose of sharing information about a genetic or hereditary illness, disease or condition that may affect the adoptee’s health, the agency shall make reasonable efforts to contact and forward the information in a manner that does not identify the birth relative, to an adoptee who is 18 or more years of age or to the adoptive parents of an adoptee who is less than 18 years of age.

All information and documentation provided in accordance with subsection (a), is confidential and remains the property of the person/agency making the full disclosure until the adoption is final. If the prospective adoptive parent refuses or terminates the placement, all information and documentation provided regarding the child and his/her birth family shall be returned to the person/agency providing full disclosure. A prospective adoptive parent shall not disclose any confidential information, except as necessary to make a placement/adoption decision or to provide to professionals who are treating, assessing or educating the child.

This section does not apply to a stepparent adoption, or the adoption of a child related to the petitioner by marriage, blood or adoption.

Any adoptee under this section, who is 18 years of age or over shall be given the information in subsection (a)(1) upon written request.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the voluntary exchange of identifying information between mutually consenting biological parents and adoptive parents and adoptees, 18 years of age or older.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 223, § 1.

15-7-3.
Report, investigation, and hearing on child brought into state for adoption.

Whenever any person or persons brings or causes to be brought a child, not related to him or her or them, into this state for the purpose of adoption, he or she or they shall make a report to the department of children, youth and families within fifteen (15) days of the entry of the child into this state.

The willful failure, neglect, or refusal of the person or persons having brought or having caused the child to be brought into this state to make the report shall be considered a violation of this chapter and prejudicial to the best interest of the child. The department, upon receipt of the notice or when it receives notice from any source that the person or persons having brought or having caused the child to be brought into this state has or have willfully failed, refused, or neglected to make the report, shall make any investigation that it deems necessary in the circumstances and report the results of that investigation to the family court within sixty (60) days after receipt of the notice.

The family court, after any notice that it deems proper to the parent or parents, and the person or persons having brought, or having caused to be brought, the child into this state, shall, after the filing of the report, hold a hearing to determine whether the proposed placement for adoption is or is not for the best interest of the child.

If the court finds that the proposed placement for adoption is not for the best interest of the child, it shall order that the child be returned to its parent or parents or placed through the department or a licensed child placing agency or with whomsoever the court deems for the best interest of the child.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 4; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-3

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

15-7-4.
Petition to adopt — Court having jurisdiction.

Any person residing in Rhode Island may petition the family court for leave to adopt as his or her child any person younger than him or herself and under eighteen (18) years of age, and, if desired, for a change of the child’s name, but the prayer of the petition by a person having a husband or wife shall not be granted unless the husband or wife joins in the petition; provided, that upon good cause shown and a showing that the granting of the petition for adoption would be in the best interests of the minor child, the prayer of the petition may be granted although the spouse of the petitioner is not a party to the petition.

The family court shall retain jurisdiction over any petition properly filed under subsection (a) when and if the petitioners become nonresidents after the petition is filed, but during the pendency of the action.

Any person not a resident of Rhode Island may petition the family court for leave to adopt as his or her child any person younger than him or herself and under eighteen (18) years of age, and, if desired, for a change of the child’s name, if the child is at the time of the filing of the petition in the care and custody of a governmental child placing agency, or licensed Rhode Island child placing agency, but the prayer of the petition by a person having a husband or wife shall not be granted unless the husband or wife joins in the petition.

Petitions for adoptions of persons eighteen (18) years or older shall be heard by the probate court of the city or town in which the petitioners live.

The department shall grant an opportunity for a fair hearing, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 671(a)(12) and chapter 35 of title 42 to an individual residing outside of Rhode Island who alleges that the department denied or delayed placement of a child for adoption.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1907, ch. 1423, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 544, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1197, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1573, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 2; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-4

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 2.

15-7-5.
Consent required.

The parents of the child, or their survivor, shall, except as provided in this section, consent in writing to the adoption, or the petition shall be dismissed. If neither parent is living, the guardian of the person of the child, or, if there is no guardian, the next of kin, may give consent; or if there is no next of kin, the court may appoint some suitable person to act in the proceedings as next friend of the child, and to give or withhold the consent; provided, that if the child is of the age of fourteen (14) years or over, the adoption shall not be made without the child’s consent. In case the child to be adopted is eighteen (18) years or older, the consent of, or notice to, the child’s parents or other person in the child’s behalf shall not be required.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, when the petitioners are one of the natural parents of the child and his or her spouse or one of the grandparents of the child and the child is residing, at the time the petition is filed, with the petitioners, if the noncustodial parent refused to consent to the adoption, the court shall determine whether the noncustodial parent’s rights shall be terminated involuntarily. In making the determination, the court shall apply the grounds for termination of parental rights set forth in §

15-7-7

; provided, that the petitioners need not demonstrate, and the court shall not require, efforts to encourage and strengthen the child’s relationship with the noncustodial parent prior to terminating his or her parental rights.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, when the petitioners are one of the natural parents of the child and his or her spouse or one of the grandparents of the child and the child is residing, at the time the petition is filed, with the petitioners, and if the noncustodial parent refuses to consent to the adoption, then the court may grant the petition without a noncustodial parent’s consent if the petitioners prove by clear and convincing evidence any of the grounds set forth in §

15-7-7(a)(1)

, (2), or (4). The standard of proof in these cases shall be by clear and convincing evidence and the court shall give primary consideration to the physical, psychological, mental, and intellectual needs of the child insofar as that consideration is not inconsistent with other provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1197, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 29, § 1.

15-7-5.1.
Contact preference form information.

Upon providing consent to an adoption, the biological parent(s) shall be informed that, consistent with §

23-3-15(g)(1)

, an adoptee may obtain a non-certified copy of his/her unaltered, original certificate of birth upon his/her eighteenth birthday, and that the birth parent is allowed and authorized to file a contact preference form with the division of vital records as provided in §

23-3-15(g)(2)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 233, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

15-7-6.
Waiver of parents’ right to consent — Guardianship of agency.

Any duly licensed child placement agency in this state, or governmental child placement agency, at the request of the natural parent or parents of a child under eighteen (18) years of age, may, not sooner than fifteen (15) days after the birth of the child, petition the family court for the termination of the rights of the natural parents of the child to consent to its adoption. After any notice to the natural parents that the court deems proper, a hearing shall be had prior to the hearing on the petition for adoption in the family court, and if the family court finds after examination of the parent or parents that the parent or parents freely join in the petition, and that the granting of the petition is for the best interests of the child, it shall decree that in the hearing on the adoption of the child the consent of the natural parents as provided above shall be unnecessary and that the agency shall be the sole party to give or withhold consent. The granting of the petition to give or withhold consent to the child placement agency shall also make the agency the guardian of the child for all purposes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 3; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-6

; P.L. 1966, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-7.
Termination of parental rights.

The court shall, upon a petition duly filed by a governmental child placement agency or licensed child placement agency, or by the birthmother or guardian of a child born under circumstances referenced in subsection (a)(2)(viii) of this section, after notice to the parent and a hearing on the petition, terminate any and all legal rights of the parent to the child, including the right to notice of any subsequent adoption proceedings involving the child, if the court finds as a fact by clear and convincing evidence that:

The parent has willfully neglected to provide proper care and maintenance for the child for a period of at least one year where financially able to do so. In determining whether the parent has willfully neglected to provide proper care and maintenance for the child, the court may disregard contributions to support that are of an infrequent and insubstantial nature; or

The parent is unfit by reason of conduct or conditions seriously detrimental to the child; such as, but not limited to, the following:

Institutionalization of the parent, including imprisonment, for a duration as to render it improbable for the parent to care for the child for an extended period of time;

Conduct toward any child of a cruel or abusive nature;

The child has been placed in the legal custody or care of the department of children, youth and families and the parent has a chronic substance abuse problem and the parent’s prognosis indicates that the child will not be able to return to the custody of the parent within a reasonable period of time, considering the child’s age and the need for a permanent home. The fact that a parent has been unable to provide care for a child for a period of twelve (12) months due to substance abuse shall constitute prima facie evidence of a chronic substance abuse problem;

The child has been placed with the department of children, youth and families and the court has previously involuntarily terminated parental rights to another child of the parent and the parent continues to lack the ability or willingness to respond to services that would rehabilitate the parent and provided further that the court finds it is improbable that an additional period of services would result in reunification within a reasonable period of time considering the child’s age and the need for a permanent home;

The parent has subjected the child to aggravated circumstances, which circumstances shall be abandonment, torture, chronic abuse, and sexual abuse;

The parent has committed murder or voluntary manslaughter on another of his or her children or has committed a felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury on that child or another of his or her children or has aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit such a murder or voluntary manslaughter;

The parent has exhibited behavior or conduct that is seriously detrimental to the child, for a duration as to render it improbable for the parent to care for the child for an extended period of time; or

The parent has been convicted of sexual assault upon the birthmother and parenthood is a result of that sexual assault, which shall be established by proving that the child was conceived as a result of a conviction for any offense set forth in §

11-37-2

, §

11-37-6

, or §

11-37-8.1

. Conception as a result of sexual assault may be proved by DNA tests and upon conviction of the putative father, and after a fact-finding hearing establishing paternity, the father’s parental rights shall be terminated by order of the court. Termination of the parental rights of the father shall include the loss of all parental rights without limitation, including the adoption of the child. The father shall also have no right to any visitation with the minor child and shall have no right to any inheritance from a child conceived as a result of sexual assault as specified;

The child has been placed in the legal custody or care of the department of children, youth and families for at least twelve (12) months, and the parents were offered or received services to correct the situation that led to the child being placed; provided, that there is not a substantial probability that the child will be able to return safely to the parents’ care within a reasonable period of time considering the child’s age and the need for a permanent home; or

The parent has abandoned or deserted the child. A lack of communication or contact with the child for at least a six-month (6) period shall constitute prima facie evidence of abandonment or desertion. In the event that parents of an infant have had no contact or communication with the infant for a period of six (6) months the department shall file a petition pursuant to this section and the family court shall conduct expedited hearings on the petition.

In the event that the petition is filed pursuant to subsection (a)(1), (a)(2)(i), (a)(2)(iii), or (a)(2)(vii) of this section, the court shall find as a fact that, prior to the granting of the petition, such parental conduct or conditions must have occurred or existed notwithstanding the reasonable efforts that shall be made by the agency prior to the filing of the petition to encourage and strengthen the parental relationship so that the child can safely return to the family. In the event that a petition is filed pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(ii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(v), (a)(2)(vi), or (a)(4) of this section, the department has no obligation to engage in reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify a family.

Any duty or obligation on the part of a licensed or governmental child placing agency to make reasonable efforts to strengthen the parental relationship shall cease upon the filing of a petition under this section. This provision shall not be construed and is not intended to limit or affect in any way the parents’ right to see or visit with the child during the pendency of a petition under this section.

Upon the filing of a termination of parental rights petition, the agency has an affirmative duty to identify, recruit, process, and approve a qualified family for adoption or other permanent living arrangement for the child.

In considering the termination of rights as pursuant to subsection (a), the court shall give primary consideration to the physical, psychological, mental, and intellectual needs of the child insofar as that consideration is not inconsistent with other provisions of this chapter.

The consideration shall include the following: If a child has been placed in foster family care, voluntarily or involuntarily, the court shall determine whether the child has been integrated into the foster family to the extent that the child’s familial identity is with the foster family and whether the foster family is able and willing to permanently integrate the child into the foster family; provided, that in considering integrating into a foster family, the court should consider:

The length of time the child has lived in a stable, satisfactory environment and the desirability of maintaining that environment and continuity for the child; and

The reasonable preference of the child, if the court determines that the child has sufficient capacity to express a reasonable preference.

If the court finds that the parental rights of the parent should be terminated as specified in subsection (a), it shall by decree duly entered, appoint some suitable person to give or withhold consent in any subsequent adoption proceedings. In the case of petitions filed by licensed or governmental child placement agencies, the court shall appoint the agency to be the sole party to give or withhold consent to the adoption of the child and further vest the agency with all rights of guardianship over the child.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the introduction of expert testimony with respect to any illness, medical or psychological condition, trauma, incompetency, addiction to drugs, or alcoholism of any parent who has exhibited behavior or conduct that is seriously detrimental to a child, to assist the court in evaluating the reason for the conduct or its probable duration.

The record of the testimony of the parties adduced in any proceeding terminating parental rights to a child shall be entitled to the confidentiality provided for in §

8-10-21

and more specifically shall not be admissible in any civil, criminal, or other proceeding in any court against a person named a defendant or respondent for any purpose, except in subsequent proceedings involving the same child or proceedings involving the same respondent.

In the event any child, the parental rights to whom have been finally terminated, has not been placed by the agency in the home of a person or persons with the intention of adopting the child within thirty (30) days from the date of the final termination decree, the family court shall review the status of the child and the agency shall file a report that documents the steps the agency is taking to find an adoptive family or other permanent living arrangement for the child, to place the child with an adoptive family, a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, or in another planned permanent living arrangement, and to finalize the adoption or legal guardianship. At a minimum, this documentation shall include child specific recruitment efforts, such as the use of state, regional, and national adoption exchanges, including the electronic exchange system.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 204, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 206, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 54, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 122, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 404, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 405, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 8, effective June 28, 2022.

15-7-7.1.
Court proceedings.

The court shall make findings of fact and conclude all hearings on petitions for termination of parental rights within one hundred eighty (180) days after notice to the natural parents has been effectuated. If the court is unable to conclude a hearing within one hundred eighty (180) days, it shall enter an order setting forth the facts which necessitate an extension of the time period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 364, § 1.

15-7-7.2.
Mediation of termination of parental rights.

The family court may establish a voluntary mediation program for termination of parental rights. Once established, the court may, with the consent of the parties, refer to mediation all or any portion of a matter relating to termination of parental rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 59, § 1.

15-7-8.
Notice to parents — Notice when no parent living or when parent in mental institution.

The notice required in §

15-7-7

shall be as follows: If a parent does not consent in writing to the adoption of his or her child, the court shall order a copy of the petition and order that copy to be served on him or her, personally, if found in the state; and if not, notice of the petition for adoption shall be published once in any newspaper that the court directs. Like notice shall also be published whenever a child has no parent living.

Whenever a parent is confined in any asylum, hospital, or institution for mental illness, whether the asylum, hospital, or institution is situated within or out of the state, the court shall order a copy of the petition and order that copy, subsequently referred to as the notice, to be served on him or her personally, which notice, if to be served within the state, shall be served by an officer authorized by law to serve citations; but if the notice is to be served out of the state, it may be served by any disinterested person, who shall make return, upon oath, that he or she has made service of the notice, the manner in which, the time when, and the place where the service was made; provided, that before any officer or disinterested person makes service of the notice, he or she shall apply to the physician in charge of the asylum, hospital, or institution where the person upon whom the notice to be served is confined, and if the physician shall return, upon oath, on the back of the notice, that in his or her opinion service of the notice upon the person will be injurious to his or her mental health, the officer or person charged with the service shall leave a copy of the notice, with the physician’s return, with the keeper of the asylum, hospital, or institution and shall return the notice, with a statement of his or her actions regarding the notice, to the court without further service; and upon return being made in either case, the court, having first appointed a guardian ad litem for the parent, may proceed to act upon the petition and order.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 192, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 244, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 4; P.L. 1925, ch. 655, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-8

; P.L. 1962, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 29.

15-7-9.
Notice to parent whose whereabouts unknown.

When a petition concerning the adoption or termination of parental rights is filed which sets forth that the whereabouts of the parent or parents of the child are unknown, that fact shall be sworn to by the petitioners by affidavit which shall set forth the last contacts with the absent parent and any other information considered pertinent in determining the absent parent’s whereabouts.

The court shall review the affidavit and, if it is determined that personal service cannot be effectuated, an order of notice shall be entered directing that notice be given to the parent by publication in any newspaper of general circulation that the court directs; which notice shall be published once and this notice may be combined and placed with other names that the court is attempting to notify.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 11; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 364, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 200, § 1.

15-7-10.
Consent of minor parents.

For the purposes of this section, “minor” refers to an individual under the age of eighteen (18).

No minor parent may give a binding consent to any adoption petition or to any termination of rights pursuant to §

15-7-6

except with the consent of one of the parents, guardian, or guardian ad litem of the minor parent; provided, that if the whereabouts of both of the parents of the minor parent are unknown, that fact shall be sworn to by the petitioners or an unauthorized officer or official of a duly licensed child placement agency or of a governmental child placement agency; after notice in accordance with §

15-7-9

and upon finding that the granting of the petition for adoption or the termination of rights is in the best interest of the child, the family court may grant the petition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 6; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-10

; P.L. 1963, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.

15-7-11.
Investigation and report as to adoptive home.

Upon the filing of a petition so presented and consented to for the adoption of a minor child, the court shall notify the department of children, youth and families. It shall then be the duty of the department to verify the allegations of the petition, and to make appropriate investigation to determine whether the proposed adoptive home is a suitable home for the child. The department shall, within sixty (60) days, submit to the court a full report in writing, with recommendation as to the granting of the petition and any other information regarding the child or the proposed home that the court shall require. In circumstances where the petition for adoption concerns a child who has been placed for adoption by a duly licensed, child-placement agency, the court may accept the home study report of the child-placement agency in lieu of the investigation and recommendation of the department of children, youth and families; provided, the child-placement agency includes in its home-study report any criminal record of the prospective adoptive parent. All costs relating to criminal background checks shall be the responsibility of the public or private entity conducting the home study;

As part of the investigation or investigative home-study report, a request shall be made to the attorney general through the division of criminal identification to make available any criminal record of the prospective adoptive parent maintained by the division. The prospective adoptive parent, and any household member age 18 and older, shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department, or the department of children, youth and families, for a nationwide criminal records check unless they have previously submitted to a nationwide criminal records check in accordance with §

14-1-34

and/or §§

40-13.2-2

,

40-13.2-4

and/or

40-13.2-5

and/or §§

16-48.1-4

and

16-48.1-5

. The attorney general shall immediately comply with the request of the department or child-placement agency, and the report of the attorney general shall be made part of the investigative home study submitted to court.

Pursuant to §

40-13.2-4

, the director of DCYF will determine by rules and regulations those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that constitute disqualifying information because that information would indicate the prospective adoptive parent could endanger the health or welfare of a child or children. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information with respect to a proposed prospective adoptive parent, the director shall inform the agency that disqualifying information has been discovered, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information.

At the conclusion of any criminal records check required by this section, the fingerprint card of the person subject to the nationwide criminal records check shall be promptly destroyed.

Provisions of this section may, in the discretion of the court, be waived in the case of a petition for the adoption of a child where the child is the natural child of one of the parties petitioning for the adoption and resides with the petitioning parties.

Specific definitions and procedures for adoptive home studies are to be provided in regulations promulgated by the department of children, youth and families in accordance with the administrative procedures act. All investigative home studies submitted to the court shall be based on a minimum of two (2) home visits by the agency conducting the home study. All prospective siblings and any other household members shall be interviewed during a home visit. Agencies conducting the home study shall have a minimum of one home visit following completion of the home study process. A summary of the agency’s past and present contact with the prospective adoptive family shall be included in the home study. The agency shall include in the home study its recommendations for approval or disapproval of the adoption and the reasons for its conclusion.

The following information shall be included in all home studies submitted to the court:

Identifying information on all household members, including minor children and the current needs of each child;

Information regarding the prospective adoptive parent’s motivation and reasons for the adoption;

Current background information on the prospective adoptive parents, including written self-assessment;

Child-care experience and parenting philosophy of the prospective adoptive parents;

Information regarding past and present marriage and/or partnership relationships;

Current medical and psychological conditions, including addiction to drugs or alcohol of any prospective adoptive parents, that may be seriously detrimental to the health and welfare of children;

Description of the home and local community, including any health and safety concerns regarding the home;

Information regarding the finances and employment of the prospective adoptive parents;

Reference letters from at least three (3) individuals at least two (2) of whom are non-relatives;

Results of background checks with DCYF and clearance checks regarding state and federal criminal records, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, conducted on the prospective adoptive parents and any household member age 18 and older;

Information related to the prospective adoptive parent’s willingness and ability to accept and cooperate with adoption support services, including their level of understanding regarding openness with birth family; and

Information related to the match between prospective adoptive parents and the child, including attitudes and capabilities of prospective adoptive parents and the child’s characteristics and background.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 852, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, § 5; P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 1; G.L., ch. 420, § 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-11

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1974, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 154, § 2.

15-7-12.
Trial period of residence.

No petition shall be granted until the child has lived for six (6) months in the proposed home; provided, that the period of residence may be waived and the petition granted by the court upon good cause shown, when satisfied that the proposed home and the child are suited to each other.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 288, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 852, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 420, §§ 5, 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3483, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-7-12

; P.L. 1970, ch. 132, § 1.